Mississippi, session 2026, HB1681.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Maternal and Family Transportation Equity Act of 2026." SECTION 2.  Purpose. The purpose of this act is to: (a)  Reduce maternal and infant health disparities in Mississippi; (b)  Eliminate transportation barriers for pregnant women and mothers up to eighteen (18) months postpartum; (c)  Provide reliable transportation to prenatal and postpartum appointments, pediatric visits, WIC appointments, grocery stores for WIC benefit redemption, pharmacies and licensed childcare centers; (d)  Ensure that transportation providers maintain appropriate child safety seats and accommodate multiple young children traveling with the mother; and (e)  Support rural and underserved families statewide. SECTION 3.  Legislative findings.  The Legislature finds that: (a)  Mississippi has among the highest maternal and infant mortality rates in the United States; (b)  Transportation access is a leading barrier to prenatal care, postpartum care, WIC benefit usage and pediatric well-child visits; (c)  Existing transportation programs do not cover certain essential needs such as WIC grocery trips, pharmacy pickups or transportation to and from child care centers; (d)  Many families with infants also have additional young children who require transportation alongside the mother; and (e)  A statewide, family-centered transportation program will improve maternal, infant and early childhood health outcomes across Mississippi. SECTION 4.  Definitions. For the purposes of this act, the following terms shall be defined as provided in this section: (a) "Department" means the State Department of Health. (b)  "Eligible mother" means any pregnant woman or mother within eighteen (18) months postpartum. (c)  "Eligible child" means any child under the age of six (6) years who resides in the same household as the eligible mother. (d)  "Family transportation services" means transportation for an eligible mother, eligible child, or eligible caregiver to: (i)  Prenatal and postpartum medical appointments; (ii)  Pediatric visits and immunizations; (iii)  WIC clinic appointments and nutrition classes; (iv)  Grocery stores for WIC benefit redemption; (v)  Pharmacies for prescription pickup; or (vi)  Licensed child care centers. (e)  "Qualified transportation provider" means an entity approved by the State Department of Health that complies with the safety, training and equipment requirements of this act.  Qualified transportation providers may include nonprofit organizations, faith-based organizations, community-based organizations, ride-share providers, public transit agencies, licensed child care centers, or other entities determined appropriate by the department. (f)  "Eligible caregiver" means the father of the child, a legal guardian, or an adult residing in the same household who is responsible for transporting the child to necessary appointments when the eligible mother is unavailable. SECTION 5. Establishment of the Maternal and Family Transportation Program.  (1)  The State Department of Health shall establish the Maternal and Family Transportation Program (program) to administer family transportation services under this act. (2)  The department may enter into agreements with: (a)  Nonprofit transportation providers; (b)  Public transit authorities; (c)  Ride-share providers; (d)  Community health centers; (e)  Licensed childcare centers; and (f)  Other entities deemed appropriate by the department. (3)  The department shall establish written eligibility standards for all qualified transportation providers to ensure compliance with safety, training and operational requirements. (4)  The department shall develop, procure, or contract for a mobile application or technology platform that provides real-time ride tracking, estimated arrival times, driver identification, communication regarding delays, and appointment reminders for eligible mothers, eligible caregivers, and eligible children.  The department shall ensure that the application is accessible, user-friendly, and compliant with all applicable privacy and security standards. (5)  All providers shall comply with application requirements, safety standards, driver reviews, child-seat requirements and training mandates as established by department. For Medicaid patients, providers must also comply with the requirements of the Division of Medicaid for non-medical emergency transportation (NMET). SECTION 6.  Authorized transportation services.  (1)  Eligible families may receive transportation for: (a)  Prenatal health appointments; (b)  Postpartum follow-up visits; (c)  Labor and delivery post-discharge visits; (d)  Pediatric appointments; (e)  WIC appointments and nutrition education; (f)  Grocery trips for WIC benefit redemption; (g)  Pharmacy visits for prescription fulfillment; (h)  Transportation to and from licensed child care centers; (i)  Trips for unexpected pregnancy symptoms; (j)  Emergency pharmacy pickups; and (k)  Trips for urgent but non-hospital needs recommended by a provider. (2)  (a)  Children under age twelve (12) may accompany the mother even if they do not have a scheduled appointment. (b)  Eligible caregivers may accompany the eligible child when the eligible mother is unable to attend the appointment due to medical recovery, work obligations, or other valid circumstances. (c)  A support partner, such as the father or a partner, doula, grandmother, may accompany the mother when needed.  Support partners can accompany women during labor triage visits, induction appointments, or fetal monitoring visits.  No additional fee may be charged for including a support partner in the transportation. SECTION 7.  Safety requirements for transportation providers.  All qualified transportation providers must: (a)  Maintain properly installed infant, toddler and booster seats in each vehicle, and for pregnant women, have pregnancy-specific accommodations such as priority seating and adequate space for comfort and options for low-step or low ramp vehicles; (b)  Ensure that all drivers are trained in child passenger safety, safe transport for infants, trauma informed care, cultural competency, perinatal mental health awareness, maternal sensitivity and proper car-seat installation practices; (c)  Maintain vehicles that are safe, cleaned between riders, climate controlled, able to accommodate strollers, have GPS tracking for safety and reliability, appropriate for transporting multiple children, and are insured for the minimum insurance requirements with clear liability protections for program-approved providers; and (d)  Conduct background checks and motor vehicle record screenings on all drivers. SECTION 8.  Intake and scheduling requirements.  (1)  Providers must ask the questions below before providing transportation and must supply the required support based on the responses.  This includes providing car seats when needed and allowing multiple stops for clinic visits, pharmacies, grocery stores, or child care centers, as well as arranging a return trip when required. (a)  Whether additional children will travel; (b)  The ages of all accompanying children; (c)  Whether a car seat will be needed for any child; (d)  Whether the trip includes multiple stops including, but not limited to, clinic visits, pharmacies, grocery stores or child care centers; and (e)  Whether a return trip is required. (2)  The department may authorize transportation scheduling via mobile application, hotline or partnering community organizations. (3)  For pregnant women, the provider must be able to provide a timely response of no more than forty-five (45) minutes for areas close to a municipality and seventy-five (75) minutes for rural areas, and provide urgent scheduling when recommended by a clinic or nurse line. SECTION 9.  Accessibility and statewide coverage.  (1)  The program shall be available statewide, with priority for rural and medically underserved counties. (2)  No eligible family may be denied services on the basis of income, insurance coverage or immigration status. (3)  Services shall include evening and weekend availability to accommodate working families. (4)  The program shall seek to encourage participation by rural transportation providers, such as church vans, ride-sharing partnerships, local taxi companies, and hospital shuttle program. (5)  If adequate funds are available, the program may provide incentives to providers such as small grants for vehicle upgrades, child safety reimbursement, fuel reimbursement, and priority licensing for program participants. SECTION 10.  Funding. Funding for the program may include: (a)  State legislative appropriations; (b)  Federal Maternal and Child Health Block Grants; (c)  Medicaid administrative match funds where allowable; (d)  Public-private partnerships; and (e)  Grants from philanthropic and community health organizations. SECTION 11.  Reporting. (1)  The department shall submit an annual report to the Legislature that includes: (a)  The number of families served; (b)  The number and types of trips provided; (c)  Prenatal and postpartum appointment compliance rates; (d)  Geographic distribution of services provided; and (e)  Fiscal impact, cost savings and recommendations for improvement. (2)  For Medicaid participants, providers must also track whether the rider is Medicaid-enrolled, and whether the ride purpose categories are aligned with requirements of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, which shall be included in the report required by subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 12.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.